Utah statutes.
53A-8a-302.   State Board of Education rules -- Reporting to Legislature.

(1)  Subject to Part 4, Educator Evaluations, and Part 7, Evaluation and Compensation of Administrators, rules adopted by the State Board of Education under Section 53A-8a-301 shall:

(a)  provide general guidelines, requirements, and procedures for the development and implementation of employee evaluations;

(b)  establish required components and allow for optional components of employee evaluations;

(c)  require school districts to chose valid and reliable methods and tools to implement the evaluations; and

(d)  establish a timeline for school districts to implement employee evaluations.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall report to the Education Interim Committee, as requested, on progress in implementing employee evaluations in accordance with this part, Part 4, Educator Evaluations, and Part 7, Evaluation and Compensation of Administrators.



Enacted by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

